Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.467

Financial education public-private partnership—Model goals.

(1) Each school district, by March 1, 2023, shall adopt one or more goals for expanding financial education instruction to students in their district. Examples of goals that school districts may adopt include:

(a) Increasing the number of financial education courses available to students in grades nine through 12;

(b) Increasing the number of grades, schools, or both that provide students with instruction in, or access to instruction in, financial education; and

(c) Expanding the amount financial education professional development training available to certificated staff.

(2) The financial education public-private partnership, by September 1, 2022, shall develop a nonexhaustive menu of model goals that school districts may consider when complying with this section. The model goals must be published on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction by September 10, 2022.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020, and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools established under chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.

[ 2022 c 238 s 3.]